Tennessee, session 114, HB1495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-2-402(c)(2)(A)(iii), is amended by
deleting "twelve (12)" and substituting "sixteen (16)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-2-402(c)(2)(D), is amended by
deleting "fifteen (15)" and substituting "twenty (20)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1495
010456
- 1 -